Hawaii statutes.
§187A-2 Powers and duties of department.
The department shall:

(1) Manage and administer the aquatic life and
aquatic resources of the State;

(2) Establish and maintain aquatic life propagating
station or stations;

(3) Establish, manage, and regulate public fishing
areas, artificial reefs, fish aggregating devices, marine life conservation
districts, shoreline fishery management areas, refuges, and other areas
pursuant to title 12;

(4) Subject to this title, import aquatic life for
the purpose of propagating and disseminating the same in the State and the
waters subject to its jurisdiction;

(5) Distribute, free of charge, as the department
deems to be in the public interest, aquatic life, for the purpose of increasing
the food supply of the State; provided that when, in the discretion of the
department, the public interest shall not be materially interfered with by so
doing, the department may propagate and furnish aquatic life to private
parties, upon such reasonable terms, conditions, and prices determined by the
department;

(6) Gather and compile information and statistics
concerning the habitat and character of, and increase and decrease in, aquatic
resources in the State, including the care and propagation of aquatic resources
for protective, productive, and aesthetic purposes, and other useful
information, which the department deems proper;

(7) Enforce all laws relating to the protecting,
taking, killing, propagating, or increasing of aquatic life within the State
and the waters subject to its jurisdiction; and

(8) Formulate and from time to time recommend to the
governor and legislature such additional legislation necessary or desirable to
implement the objectives of title 12. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1; am L 1998, c
176, §7]

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next